Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Computer science. new text end new text begin A district is encouraged to adopt local computer science standards aligned with the computer science framework developed by the Department of Education. A district may adopt the computer science standards developed by the Department of Education when the standards are available. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Standards development. (a) The commissioner must consider advice from at least the following stakeholders in developing statewide rigorous core academic standards in language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, including history, geography, economics, government and citizenship, health, new text begin computer science, new text end and the arts: (1) parents of school-age children and members of the public throughout the state; (2) teachers throughout the state currently licensed and providing instruction in language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, health, or the arts and licensed elementary and secondary school principals throughout the state currently administering a school site; (3) currently serving members of local school boards and charter school boards throughout the state; (4) faculty teaching core subjects at postsecondary institutions in Minnesota; (5) representatives of the Minnesota business community; (6) representatives from the Tribal Nations Education Committee and Tribal Nations and communities in Minnesota, including both Anishinaabe and Dakota; and (7) current students, with input from the Minnesota Youth Council. (b) Academic standards must: (1) be clear, concise, objective, measurable, and grade-level appropriate; (2) not require a specific teaching methodology or curriculum; and (3) be consistent with the Constitutions of the United States and the state of Minnesota. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.021, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Rulemaking. (a) The commissioner, consistent with the requirements of this section and section 120B.022, must adopt statewide rules under section 14.389 for implementing statewide rigorous core academic standards in language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, physical education, and the arts. (b) The commissioner must adopt statewide rules for implementing statewide rigorous core academic standards in health. new text begin (c) The commissioner is not required to adopt statewide rules for computer science standards. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.241, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Computer science education supervisor. The Department of Education must employ a computer science supervisor dedicated to: (1) the implementation of this section and the implementation of the computer science education strategic plan developed by the working group under subdivision 3; (2) outreach to districts that need additional supports to create or advance their computer science programsnew text begin , including guidance on adopting and using the computer science framework under subdivision 8new text end ; and (3) supporting districts in using existing and available resources for districts to create and advance their computer science programs. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.241, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Framework. new text end new text begin By July 1, 2026, the Department of Education must adopt a computer science framework to guide districts' development and implementation of computer science education in kindergarten through grade 12. The framework must: new text end new text begin (1) define computer science and identify skills computer science instruction should include at different grade levels; new text end new text begin (2) provide guidance to districts on how to implement the framework; and new text end new text begin (3) recommend teaching practices on how to reduce barriers to access, participation, and experience in computer science classes including ensuring curriculum and course content is accessible to individuals with disabilities. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.241, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Plan implementation. new text end new text begin By July 1, 2027, the Department of Education must develop a plan to increase awareness of the computer science state strategic plan throughout implementation of the plan, and take the following steps toward implementation of the strategic plan: new text end new text begin (1) implement a data collection plan for school districts to retrieve an accurate count of access, participation, and success in computer science education across kindergarten through grade 12; new text end new text begin (2) define key performance indicators and success measures of computer science education in Minnesota, such as participation in computer science by key student demographics, the number of qualified teachers to teach computer science, and the number of schools teaching computer science; new text end new text begin (3) develop a strategy for professional learning that includes learning for teachers, school administrators, school counselors, paraprofessionals, special education specialists, and other education support personnel around computer science. The strategy must include: new text end new text begin (i) criteria for what constitutes a high-quality program of professional learning; new text end new text begin (ii) an evaluative tool or series of rubrics school districts can use to vet and recommend computer science professional learning programs; and new text end new text begin (iii) recommendations on how to align professional learning with both integrated and standalone computer science instruction separately; new text end new text begin (4) provide recommendations for how to expand computer science access to schools that serve rural populations and low-income populations; new text end new text begin (5) provide recommendations for how to ensure access to computer science for the Tribal Nations and Indigenous communities of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (6) align career and technical education frameworks developed by the department with the framework under subdivision 8, and with secondary education and career pathways in the computer science field; and new text end new text begin (7) research the viability and effectiveness of creating an online computer science resource hub that includes but is not limited to resources for teaching, curriculum, and learning communities. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.241, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Standards. new text end new text begin Following development of the framework under subdivision 8, the department must use the standards development process under section 120B.021 to develop academic standards in computer science. A school district is not required to implement the state standards. new text end